test/src/morphology/adj_Likestavelser_S_adjektiv_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - orre: # c 
    orre+A+Attr: orre 
    orre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: urrebe 
    orre+A+Sg+Nom: orre 
    orre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: urremes
    
  Adjective - plaave: # 
    plaave+A+Attr: plaave 
    plaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [plaavebe]
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaave, plaaves]
    plaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plaavemes
        
  Adjective - pliejhkies: # 
    pliejhkies+A+Attr: [pliejhkies]
    pliejhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkebe]
    pliejhkies+A+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkie, pliejhkies]
    pliejhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [pliejhkemes]

  Adjective - plievhties: # 
    plievhties+A+Attr: plievhties 
    plievhties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: plievhtebe 
    plievhties+A+Sg+Nom: [plievhtie, plievhties]
    plievhties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plievhtemes
      
  Adjective - provne: # 
    provne+A+Attr: provne 
    provne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: provnebe 
    provne+A+Sg+Nom: provnes 
    provne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: provnemes

  Adjective - pruvres: # 
    pruvres+A+Attr: pruvres 
    pruvres+A+Sg+Nom: pruvres
    
  Adjective - raeffies: # 
    raeffies+A+Attr: raeffies 
    raeffies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: raeffebe 
    raeffies+A+Sg+Nom: [raeffie, raeffies]
    raeffies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: raeffemes

  Adjective - raejnies: # 
    raejnies+A+Attr: raejnies 
    raejnies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: raejnebe 
    raejnies+A+Sg+Nom: [raejnie, raejnies]
    raejnies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: raejnemes

  Adjective - riejries: # 
    riejries+A+Attr: riejries 
    riejries+A+Sg+Nom: riejries 
    
  Adjective - rupmies: # 
    rupmies+A+Attr: rupmies 
    rupmies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rupmebe 
    rupmies+A+Sg+Nom: [rupmie, rupmies]
    rupmies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rupmemes 
    
  Adjective - rutjkes: # 
    rutjkes+A+Attr: rutjkes 
    rutjkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rutjkesabpa, rutjkesåbpoe, rutjkebe]
    rutjkes+A+Sg+Nom: rutjkes 
    rutjkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rutjkesommes, rutjkemes]
    
  Adjective - rïekte: # 
    rïekte+A+Attr: rïekte 
    rïekte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [rïektebe, rïektesabpa, rïektesåbpoe]
    rïekte+A+Sg+Nom: rïektes 
    rïekte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rïektemes, rïektesommes, rïektesammes]

  Adjective - rööpses: # 
    rööpses+A+Attr: rööpses 
    rööpses+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [ruepsebe]
    rööpses+A+Sg+Nom: rööpses 
    rööpses+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [rööpsemes]
    
  Adjective - saejkies: # 
    saejkies+A+Attr: saejkies 
    saejkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: saejkebe 
    saejkies+A+Sg+Nom: [saejkie, saejkies]
    saejkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: saejkemes

  Adjective - saelhties: # 
    saelhties+A+Attr: saelhties 
    saelhties+A+Sg+Nom: [saelhtie, saelhties]

  Adjective - seadtoes: # c 
    seadtoes+A+Attr: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seadtasabpa, seadtoesåbpoe]
    seadtoes+A+Sg+Nom: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [seadtoesommes, seadtasammes]

  Adjective - seakoes: # 
    seakoes+A+Attr: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seakoesabpa, seakoesåbpoe]
    seakoes+A+Sg+Nom: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [seakoesommes, seakasammes]  
    
  Adjective - siegkies: # 
    siegkies+A+Attr: siegkies 
    siegkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: siegkebe 
    siegkies+A+Sg+Nom: [siegkie, siegkies]
    siegkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: siegkemes

  Adjective - sieties: # 
    sieties+A+Attr: sieties 
    sieties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sietebe 
    sieties+A+Sg+Nom: [sietie, sieties]
    sieties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sietemes
       
  Adjective - sjïere: # 
    sjïere+A+Attr: sjïere 
    sjïere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sjïerebe 
    sjïere+A+Sg+Nom: sjïere 
    sjïere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sjïeremes  
    
  Adjective - smaave: # 
    smaave+A+Attr: smaave 
    smaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [smaevebe, smaevebe]
    smaave+A+Sg+Nom: smaave 
    smaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [smaevemes, smaevemes]

  Adjective - sneehpes: # c 
    sneehpes+A+Attr: [sneehpes, sneehpes]
    sneehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sneehpebe, sneehpesabpa, sneehpesåbpoe, snaebpebe]
    sneehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [sneehpes]
    sneehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [sneehpemes, sneehpesommes, sneehpesammes]
    
    
  Adjective - spaajhte: # 
    spaajhte+A+Attr: spaajhte 
    spaajhte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: spaajhtebe 
    spaajhte+A+Sg+Nom: spaajhte 
    spaajhte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: spaajhtemes

  Adjective - staeries: # 
    staeries+A+Attr: staeries 
    staeries+A+Sg+Nom: staaran 

  Adjective - stinkes: # 
    stinkes+A+Attr: stinkes 
    stinkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stinkebe 
    stinkes+A+Sg+Nom: stinkes 
    stinkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stinkemes

  Adjective - stoere: # c 
    stoere+A+Attr: stoere 
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stuerebe, stuerebe]
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: stoere 
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stööremes

  Adjective - stoerre: # 
    stoerre+A+Attr: stoerre 
    stoerre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stuerebe 
    stoerre+A+Sg+Nom: stoerre 
    stoerre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stööremes

  Adjective - stonkes: # 
    stonkes+A+Attr: [stonkes]
    stonkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stonkebe, stonkesabpa, stonkesåbpoe]
    stonkes+A+Sg+Nom: [stonkes, stonkes]
    stonkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [stonkemes, stonkesommes, stonkesammes]

  Adjective - stunkes: # 
    stunkes+A+Attr: stunkes 
    stunkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stunkebe,stunkesåbpoe, stunkesammes] 
    stunkes+A+Sg+Nom: stunkes 
    stunkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [stunkemes, stunkesåbpoe, stunkesammes]  
    
  Adjective - sïejhme: # c 
    sïejhme+A+Attr: sïejhme 
    sïejhme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sïejhmebe 
    sïejhme+A+Sg+Nom: sïejhme 
    sïejhme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sïejhmemes

  Adjective - sïemes: # 
    sïemes+A+Attr: sïemes 
    sïemes+A+Sg+Nom: sïemes 

  Adjective - sööjmes: # 
    sööjmes+A+Attr: sööjmes 
    sööjmes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [sööjmebe, suejmebe]
    sööjmes+A+Sg+Nom: sööjmes 
    sööjmes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sööjmemes

  Adjective - söökes: # 
    söökes+A+Attr: söökes 
    söökes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [söökesabpa, söökesåbpoe, suekebe]
    söökes+A+Sg+Nom: söökes 
    söökes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [sööksommes, söökesammes, söökemes]
       
  Adjective - tjamke: # 
    tjamke+A+Attr: tjamke 
    tjamke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjamkebe 
    tjamke+A+Sg+Nom: tjamke 
    tjamke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjamkemes

  Adjective - tjarke: # c 
    tjarke+A+Attr: tjarke 
    tjarke+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjarkebe 
    tjarke+A+Sg+Nom: tjarke 
    tjarke+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjarkemes

  Adjective - tjarki: # 
    tjarki+A+Attr: tjarki 
    tjarki+A+Sg+Nom: tjarki
    
  Adjective - tjeehpes: # c 
    tjeehpes+A+Attr: [tjeehpes, tjeehpes]
    tjeehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [tjeehpebe, tjeehpesabpa, tjeehpesåbpoe]
    tjeehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [tjeehpes, tjeehpes]
    tjeehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [tjeehpemes, tjeehpesommes, tjeehpesammes] 
    
  Adjective - tjevties: # 
    tjevties+A+Attr: tjevties 
    tjevties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjevtebe 
    tjevties+A+Sg+Nom: [tjevtie, tjevties]
    tjevties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjevtemes

  Adjective - tjiehpies: # 
    tjiehpies+A+Attr: tjiehpies 
    tjiehpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjiehpebe 
    tjiehpies+A+Sg+Nom: [tjiehpie, tjiehpies]
    tjiehpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjiehpemes
    
  Adjective - tjuerpies: # 
    tjuerpies+A+Attr: tjuerpies 
    tjuerpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjuerpebe 
    tjuerpies+A+Sg+Nom: [tjuerpie, tjuerpies]
    tjuerpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjuerpemes
    
  Adjective - tjïrkes: # 
    tjïrkes+A+Attr: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesabpa, tjïrkesåbpoe]
    tjïrkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesommes, tjïrkesammes]

  Adjective - tjöölle: # 
    tjöölle+A+Attr: tjöölle 
    tjöölle+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjööllebe 
    tjöölle+A+Sg+Nom: tjöölle 
    tjöölle+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjööllemes

  Adjective - tovme: # 
    tovme+A+Attr: tovme 
    tovme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tovmebe 
    tovme+A+Sg+Nom: tovmes 
    tovme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tovmemes

  Adjective - tryjjes: # 
    tryjjes+A+Attr: tryjjes 
    tryjjes+A+Sg+Nom: tryjjes 
       
  Adjective - tsåatskes: # 
    tsåatskes+A+Attr: tsåatskes 

  Adjective - vaejvies: # 
    vaejvies+A+Attr: vaejvies 
    vaejvies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vaejvebe 
    vaejvies+A+Sg+Nom: [vaejvie, vaejvies]
    vaejvies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vaejvemes

  Adjective - vaenie: # c 
    vaenie+A+Attr: vaenie 
    vaenie+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vaenebe 
    vaenie+A+Sg+Nom: vaenie 
    vaenie+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vaenemes

  Adjective - varres: # 
    varres+A+Attr: varres 
    varres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [varresabpa, varresåbpoe]
    varres+A+Sg+Nom: varres 
    varres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [varresommes, varresammes]   
    
  Adjective - veelkes: # 
    veelkes+A+Attr: veelkes 
    veelkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [vielkebe, veelkemes]
    veelkes+A+Sg+Nom: veelkes 
    veelkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [veelkemes, veelkemes]

  Adjective - vervies: # 
    vervies+A+Attr: vervies 

  Adjective - vesties: # 
    vesties+A+Attr: vesties 
    vesties+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vestebe 
    vesties+A+Sg+Nom: [vestie, vesties]
    vesties+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vestemes

  Adjective - viesjies: # 
    viesjies+A+Attr: viesjies 
    viesjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: viesjebe 
    viesjies+A+Sg+Nom: [viesjie, viesjies]
    viesjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: viesjemes
       
  Adjective - vihties: # c 
    vihties+A+Attr: vihties 
    vihties+A+Sg+Nom: vihties 

  Adjective - vijries: # c 
    vijries+A+Attr: vijries 
    vijries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vijrebe 
    vijries+A+Sg+Nom: [vijrie, vijries]
    vijries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vijremes

  Adjective - viskes: # 
    viskes+A+Attr: viskes 
    viskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: viskebe 
    viskes+A+Sg+Nom: viskes 
    viskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: viskemes

  Adjective - voeres: # 
    voeres+A+Attr: voeres 
    voeres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [voeresabpa, voeresåbpoe]
    voeres+A+Sg+Nom: voeres 
    voeres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [voeresammes, voeresommes]
      
  Adjective - åehpies: # 
    åehpies+A+Attr: åehpies 
    åehpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [åahpatjabpa, åahpatjåbpoe]
    åehpies+A+Sg+Nom: [åahpetje, åehpie] 
    åehpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [åahpatjommes, åahpatjammes]

  Adjective - åelkies: # 
    åelkies+A+Attr: åelkies 

  Adjective - åemie: # 
    åemie+A+Attr: åemie 
    
  Adjective - aejlies: # 
    aejlies+A+Attr: aejlies 
    aejlies+A+Sg+Nom: [aejlie, aejles]

  Adjective - aelhkies: # 
    aelhkies+A+Attr: aelhkies 
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aelhkebe 
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Nom: aelhkie 
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aelhkemes
    
  Adjective - baetjkies: # ok
    baetjkies+A+Attr: baetjkies 
    baetjkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: baetjkebe 
    baetjkies+A+Sg+Nom: [baetjkie, baetjkies]
    baetjkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: baetjkemes













 









 











 



 
